Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-325
Public buildings; expenditures for works of art; contracted separately.

Expenditures for works of art shall be contracted for separately from all other items in the original construction of any public building.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 17.